North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 5. Jurisdiction.

§ 7A-25.
Original jurisdiction of the Supreme Court.

The Supreme Court has original jurisdiction to hear claims against the State, but its decisions shall be merely recommendatory; no process in the nature of execution shall issue thereon; the decisions shall be reported to the next session of the General Assembly for its action. The court shall by rule prescribe the procedures to be followed in the proper exercise of the jurisdiction conferred by this section.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1.

§ 7A-26.
Appellate jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals.

The Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals respectively have jurisdiction to review upon appeal decisions of the several courts of the General Court of Justice and of administrative agencies, upon matters of law or legal inference, in accordance with the system of appeals provided in this Article.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A Powerless Judiciary? The North Carolina Courts’ Perceptions of Review of Administrative Action,” see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1980).

For article, “Allocating Adjudicative Decision Making Authority Between the Trial and Appellate Levels: A Unified View of the Scope of Review, the Judge / Jury Question, and Procedural Discretion,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 993 (1986).

§ 7A-27.
Appeals of right from the courts of the trial divisions.

Appeal lies of right directly to the Supreme Court in any of the following cases:

All cases in which the defendant is convicted of murder in the first degree and the judgment of the superior court includes a sentence of death.

From any final judgment in a case designated as a mandatory complex business case pursuant to

G.S. 7A-45.4

or designated as a discretionary complex business case pursuant to Rule 2.1 of the General Rules of Practice for the Superior and District Courts.

From any interlocutory order of a Business Court Judge that does any of the following:

Affects a substantial right.

In effect determines the action and prevents a judgment from which an appeal might be taken.

Discontinues the action.

Grants or refuses a new trial.

Any trial court’s decision regarding class action certification under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 23.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-18, s. 1, effective July 1, 2021, and applicable to appeals filed on or after that date.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-125, s. 22(b), 4th Ex. Sess., effective December 1, 2016.

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, appeal lies of right directly to the Court of Appeals in any of the following cases:

From any final judgment of a superior court, other than one based on a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, including any final judgment entered upon review of a decision of an administrative agency, except for a final judgment entered upon review of a court martial under

G.S. 127A-62

.

From any final judgment of a district court in a civil action.

From any interlocutory order or judgment of a superior court or district court in a civil action or proceeding that does any of the following:

Affects a substantial right.

In effect determines the action and prevents a judgment from which an appeal might be taken.

Discontinues the action.

Grants or refuses a new trial.

Determines a claim prosecuted under

G.S. 50-19.1

.

Grants temporary injunctive relief restraining the State or a political subdivision of the State from enforcing the operation or execution of an act of the General Assembly. This sub-subdivision only applies where the State or a political subdivision of the State is a party in the civil action.

From any other order or judgment of the superior court from which an appeal is authorized by statute.

through (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-411, s. 1, effective August 23, 2013.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1; 1971, c. 377, s. 3; 1973, c. 704; 1977, c. 711, s. 4; 1987, c. 679; 1995, c. 204, s. 1; 2010-193, s. 17; 2013-411, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 18B.16(e); 2014-102, s. 1; 2015-264, s. 1(b); 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 22(b); 2017-7, s. 2; 2021-18, s. 1.

§ 7A-28.
Decisions of Court of Appeals on post-trial motions for appropriate relief, valuation of exempt property, or courts-martial are final.

Decisions of the Court of Appeals upon review of motions for appropriate relief listed in G.S. 15A-1415(b) are final and not subject to further review in the Supreme Court by appeal, motion, certification, writ, or otherwise.

Decisions of the Court of Appeals upon review of valuation of exempt property under G.S. 1C are final and not subject to further review in the Supreme Court by appeal, motion, certification, writ, or otherwise.

Decisions of the Court of Appeals upon review of courts-martial under

G.S. 127A-62

are final and not subject to further review in the Supreme Court by appeal, motion, certification, writ, or otherwise.

History.

1981, c. 470, s. 1; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1224, s. 16; 2010-193, s. 18.

§ 7A-29.
Appeals of right from certain administrative agencies.

From any final order or decision of the North Carolina Utilities Commission not governed by subsection (b) of this section, the Department of Health and Human Services under G.S. 131E-188(b), the North Carolina Industrial Commission, the North Carolina State Bar under

G.S. 84-28

, the Property Tax Commission under

G.S. 105-290

and

G.S. 105-342

, the Commissioner of Insurance under

G.S. 58-2-80

, the State Board of Elections under

G.S. 163-127.6

, the Office of Administrative Hearings under

G.S. 126-34.02

, or the Secretary of Environmental Quality under

G.S. 104E-6.2

or

G.S. 130A-293

, appeal as of right lies directly to the Court of Appeals.

From any final order or decision of the Utilities Commission in a general rate case, appeal as of right lies directly to the Supreme Court.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1; 1971, c. 703, s. 5; 1975, c. 582, s. 12; 1979, c. 584, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 28; 1983, c. 526, s. 1; c. 761, s. 188; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1000, s. 2; c. 1087, s. 2; c. 1113, s. 2; 1985, c. 462, s. 3; 1987, c. 850, s. 2; 1991, c. 546, s. 2; c. 679, s. 2; 1993, c. 501, s. 2; 1995, c. 115, s. 1; c. 504, s. 2; c. 509, s. 2; 1997-443, ss. 11A.118(a), 11A.119(a); 2003-63, s. 1; 2006-155, s. 1.1; 2013-382, s. 6.4; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Cross References.

As to jurisdiction of the Supreme Court to review, when authorized by law, direct appeals from a final order or decision of the North Carolina Utilities Commission, see N.C. Const., Art. IV, § 12(1).

As to scope of judicial review of orders of the Property Tax Commission, see

G.S. 105-345

et seq.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” and “G.S. 163A-1030” for “G.S. 163-127.6” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (a).

§ 7A-30.
Appeals of right from certain decisions of the Court of Appeals.

Except as provided in

G.S. 7A-28

, an appeal lies of right to the Supreme Court from any decision of the Court of Appeals rendered in a case:

Which directly involves a substantial question arising under the Constitution of the United States or of this State, or

In which there is a dissent when the Court of Appeals is sitting in a panel of three judges. An appeal of right pursuant to this subdivision is not effective until after the Court of Appeals sitting en banc has rendered a decision in the case, if the Court of Appeals hears the case en banc, or until after the time for filing a motion for rehearing of the cause by the Court of Appeals has expired or the Court of Appeals has denied the motion for rehearing.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1; 1983, c. 526, s. 2; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 22(c).

Cross References.

As to jurisdiction of the Supreme Court to review, when authorized by law, direct appeals from a final order or decision of the North Carolina Utils. Commission, see N.C. Const., Art. IV, § 12(1).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 22(c), effective December 12, 2016, added the language following “dissent” in subdivision (2).

Legal Periodicals.

For statistical analysis of all of the opinions of the North Carolina Supreme Court for the year 1977, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 39 (1979).

For article, “The Discipline and Removal of Judges in North Carolina,” see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1981).

For 1984 survey of appellate procedure, “Appellate Rule 16(b) and New Requirements for Appeals of Right,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1074 (1985).

For comment, “The Burial of an Impartial Judicial System: The Lifting of Restrictions on Judicial Candidate Speech in North Carolina,” see 33 Wake Forest L. Rev. 413 (1998).

For a brief discussion of the scope of review under this section, see 22 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2000).

For recent development: “ ‘Deference Does Not by Definition Preclude Relief’: The Impact of Miller-El v. Dretke on Batson Review in North Carolina Capital Appeals,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 1328 (2006).

For article, “Simple Justice: In re J.D.B. and Custodial Interrogations,” see 89 N.C.L. Rev. 685 (2011).

For article, “What Exactly Is a ‘Substantial Constitutional Question’ for Purposes of Appeal to the North Carolina Supreme Court?,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 211 (2011).

§ 7A-31.
Discretionary review by the Supreme Court.

In any cause in which appeal is taken to the Court of Appeals, including any cause heard while the Court of Appeals was sitting en banc, except a cause appealed from the North Carolina Industrial Commission, the North Carolina State Bar pursuant to

G.S. 84-28

, the Property Tax Commission pursuant to

G.S. 105-345

, the Board of State Contract Appeals pursuant to

G.S. 143-135.9

, the Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to

G.S. 58-2-80

or

G.S. 58-65-131(c)

, a court-martial pursuant to

G.S. 127A-62

, a motion for appropriate relief, or valuation of exempt property pursuant to

G.S. 7A-28

, the Supreme Court may, in its discretion, on motion of any party to the cause or on its own motion, certify the cause for review by the Supreme Court, either before or after it has been determined by the Court of Appeals. A cause appealed to the Court of Appeals from any of the administrative bodies listed in the preceding sentence may be certified in similar fashion, but only after determination of the cause in the Court of Appeals. The effect of such certification is to transfer the cause from the Court of Appeals to the Supreme Court for review by the Supreme Court. If the cause is certified for transfer to the Supreme Court before its determination in the Court of Appeals, review is not had in the Court of Appeals but the cause is forthwith transferred for review in the first instance by the Supreme Court. If the cause is certified for transfer to the Supreme Court after its determination by the Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court reviews the decision of the Court of Appeals.Except in courts-martial and motions within the purview of

G.S. 7A-28

, the State may move for certification for review of any criminal cause, but only after determination of the cause by the Court of Appeals.

In causes subject to certification under subsection (a) of this section, certification may be made by the Supreme Court before determination of the cause by the Court of Appeals when in the opinion of the Supreme Court any of the following apply:

The subject matter of the appeal has significant public interest.

The cause involves legal principles of major significance to the jurisprudence of the State.

Delay in final adjudication is likely to result from failure to certify and thereby cause substantial harm.

The work load of the courts of the appellate division is such that the expeditious administration of justice requires certification.

The subject matter of the appeal is important in overseeing the jurisdiction and integrity of the court system.

In causes subject to certification under subsection (a) of this section, certification may be made by the Supreme Court after determination of the cause by the Court of Appeals when in the opinion of the Supreme Court any of the following apply:

The subject matter of the appeal has significant public interest.

The cause involves legal principles of major significance to the jurisprudence of the State.

The decision of the Court of Appeals appears likely to be in conflict with a decision of the Supreme Court.

Interlocutory determinations by the Court of Appeals, including orders remanding the cause for a new trial or for other proceedings, shall be certified for review by the Supreme Court only upon a determination by the Supreme Court that failure to certify would cause a delay in final adjudication which would probably result in substantial harm.

The procedure for certification by the Supreme Court on its own motion, or upon petition of a party, shall be prescribed by rule of the Supreme Court.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1; 1969, c. 1044; 1975, c. 555; 1977, c. 711, s. 5; 1981, c. 470, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1224, s. 17; c. 1253, s. 1; 1983, c. 526, s. 3; c. 761, s. 189; 2010-193, s. 19; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 22(d); 2017-7, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to jurisdiction of the Supreme Court to review, when authorized by law, direct appeals from a final order or decision of the North Carolina Utilities Commission, see N.C. Const., Art. IV, § 12(1).

§ 7A-31.1.
Discretionary Review by the Court of Appeals.

In the case of a court-martial in which appeal is taken to the Wake County Superior Court under

G.S. 127A-62

, the Court of Appeals may, in its discretion, on motion of any party to the cause or on its own motion, certify the cause for review by the Court of Appeals after it has been reviewed by the Wake County Superior Court. The effect of such certification is to transfer the cause from the Wake County Superior Court to the Court of Appeals, and the Court of Appeals reviews the decision by the Wake County Superior Court.

In causes subject to certification under subsection (a) of this section, certification may be made by the Court of Appeals after determination of the cause by the Wake County Superior Court when in the opinion of the Court of Appeals:

The subject matter of the appeal has significant public interest, or

The cause involves legal principles of major significance to the jurisprudence of the State, or

The decision of the Wake County Superior Court appears likely to be in conflict with a decision of the United States Court of Appeals for the Armed Forces.

Interlocutory determinations by the Wake County Superior Court, including orders remanding the cause for a new trial or for other proceedings, shall be certified for review by the Court of Appeals only upon a determination by the Court of Appeals that failure to certify would cause a delay in final adjudication which would probably result in substantial harm.

Any rules for practice and procedure for review of courts-martial that may be required shall be prescribed pursuant to

G.S. 7A-33

.

History.

2010-193, s. 20.

§ 7A-32.
Power of Supreme Court and Court of Appeals to issue remedial writs.

The Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals have jurisdiction, exercisable by any one of the justices or judges of the respective courts, to issue the writ of habeas corpus upon the application of any person described in

G.S. 17-3

, according to the practice and procedure provided therefor in chapter 17 of the General Statutes, and to rule of the Supreme Court.

The Supreme Court has jurisdiction, exercisable by one justice or by such number of justices as the court may by rule provide, to issue the prerogative writs, including mandamus, prohibition, certiorari, and supersedeas, in aid of its own jurisdiction or in exercise of its general power to supervise and control the proceedings of any of the other courts of the General Court of Justice. The practice and procedure shall be as provided by statute or rule of the Supreme Court, or, in the absence of statute or rule, according to the practice and procedure of the common law.

The Court of Appeals has jurisdiction, exercisable by one judge or by such number of judges as the Supreme Court may by rule provide, to issue the prerogative writs, including mandamus, prohibition, certiorari, and supersedeas, in aid of its own jurisdiction, or to supervise and control the proceedings of any of the trial courts of the General Court of Justice, and of the Utilities Commission and the Industrial Commission. The practice and procedure shall be as provided by statute or rule of the Supreme Court, or, in the absence of statute or rule, according to the practice and procedure of the common law.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For 1984 survey, “Double Jeopardy and Substantial Rights in North Carolina Appeals,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1061 (1985).

For 1984 survey of appellate procedure, “Appellate Rule 16(b) and New Requirements for Appeals of Right,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1074 (1985).

§ 7A-33.
Supreme Court to prescribe appellate division rules of practice and procedure.

The Supreme Court shall prescribe rules of practice and procedure designed to procure the expeditious and inexpensive disposition of all litigation in the appellate division.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1.

Cross References.

For the North Carolina Rules of Appellate Procedure, see the Annotated Rules of North Carolina.

Legal Periodicals.

For recent development, “The Supreme Court of North Carolina’s Rulemaking Authority and the Struggle for Power: State v. Tutt,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2100 (2006).

§ 7A-34.
Rules of practice and procedure in trial courts.

The Supreme Court is hereby authorized to prescribe rules of practice and procedure for the superior and district courts supplementary to, and not inconsistent with, acts of the General Assembly.

History.

1967, c. 108, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The 1980 Amendments to the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure and Proposals for North Carolina Practice,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 915 (1980).

For article, “Rummaging Through a Wilderness of Verbiage: The Charge Conference, Jury Argument and Instructions,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 269 (1986).

§ 7A-34.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.23(f), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

2001-388, s. 2.

§ 7A-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 377, s. 32.

§ 7A-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 1190, s. 57.

§ 7A-37.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 553.

§ 7A-37.1.
Statewide court-ordered, nonbinding arbitration in certain civil actions.

The General Assembly finds that court-ordered, nonbinding arbitration may be a more economical, efficient and satisfactory procedure to resolve certain civil actions than by traditional civil litigation and therefore authorizes court-ordered nonbinding arbitration as an alternative civil procedure, subject to these provisions.

The Supreme Court of North Carolina may adopt rules governing this procedure and may supervise its implementation and operation through the Administrative Office of the Courts. These rules shall ensure that no party is deprived of the right to jury trial and that any party dissatisfied with an arbitration award may have trial de novo.

Except as otherwise provided in rules promulgated by the Supreme Court of North Carolina pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, this procedure shall be employed in all civil actions in district court, unless all parties to the action waive arbitration under this section.

(c1)

Except as provided in subsection (c2) of this section, in cases referred to nonbinding arbitration as provided in this section, a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be assessed per arbitration, to be divided equally among the parties, to cover the cost of providing arbitrators. Fees assessed under this section shall be paid to the clerk of superior court in the county where the case was filed and remitted by the clerk to the State Treasurer.

(c2)

In appeals in small claims actions under Article 19 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, if (i) the arbitrator finds in favor of the appellee, (ii) the arbitrator’s decision is appealed for trial de novo under

G.S. 7A-229

, and (iii) the arbitrator’s decision is affirmed on appeal, then the court shall consider the fact that the arbitrator’s decision was affirmed as a significant factor in favor of assessing all court costs and attorneys’ fees associated with the case in both the original action and the two appeals, including the arbitration fee assessed under subsection (c1) of this section, against the appellant.

This procedure may be implemented in a judicial district, in selected counties within a district, or in any court within a district, if the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the cognizant Senior Resident Superior Court Judge or the Chief District Court Judge of any court selected for this procedure, determine that use of this procedure may assist in the administration of justice toward achieving objectives stated in subsection (a) of this section in a judicial district, county, or court. The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, acting upon the recommendation of the cognizant Senior Resident Superior Court Judge or Chief District Court Judge of any court selected for this procedure, may terminate this procedure in any judicial district, county, or court upon a determination that its use has not accomplished objectives stated in subsection (a) of this section.

Arbitrators in this procedure shall have the same immunity as judges from civil liability for their official conduct.

History.

1989, c. 301, s. 1; 2002-126, s. 14.3(a); 2003-284, s. 36A.1; 2013-159, s. 3; 2013-225, s. 1.

§ 7A-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 500, s. 3.

§ 7A-38.1.
Mediated settlement conferences in superior court civil actions.

Purpose. — The General Assembly finds that a system of court-ordered mediated settlement conferences should be established to facilitate the settlement of superior court civil actions and to make civil litigation more economical, efficient, and satisfactory to litigants and the State. Therefore, this section is enacted to require parties to superior court civil actions and their representatives to attend a pretrial, mediated settlement conference conducted pursuant to this section and pursuant to rules of the Supreme Court adopted to implement this section.

Definitions. — As used in this section:

“Mediated settlement conference” means a pretrial, court-ordered conference of the parties to a civil action and their representatives conducted by a mediator.

“Mediation” means an informal process conducted by a mediator with the objective of helping parties voluntarily settle their dispute.

“Mediator” means a neutral person who acts to encourage and facilitate a resolution of a pending civil action. A mediator does not make an award or render a judgment as to the merits of the action.

Rules of procedure. — The Supreme Court may adopt rules to implement this section.

Statewide implementation. — Mediated settlement conferences authorized by this section shall be implemented in all judicial districts as soon as practicable, as determined by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Cases selected for mediated settlement conferences. — The senior resident superior court judge of any participating district may order a mediated settlement conference for any superior court civil action pending in the district. The senior resident superior court judge may by local rule order all cases, not otherwise exempted by the Supreme Court rule, to mediated settlement conference.

Attendance of parties. — The parties to a superior court civil action in which a mediated settlement conference is ordered, their attorneys and other persons or entities with authority, by law or by contract, to settle the parties’ claims shall attend the mediated settlement conference unless excused by rules of the Supreme Court or by order of the senior resident superior court judge. Nothing in this section shall require any party or other participant in the conference to make a settlement offer or demand which it deems is contrary to its best interests.

Sanctions. — Any person required to attend a mediated settlement conference or other settlement procedure under this section who, without good cause, fails to attend or fails to pay any or all of the mediator’s or other neutral’s fee in compliance with this section and the rules promulgated by the Supreme Court to implement this section is subject to the contempt powers of the court and monetary sanctions imposed by a resident or presiding superior court judge. The monetary sanctions may include the payment of fines, attorneys’ fees, mediator and neutral fees, and the expenses and loss of earnings incurred by persons attending the procedure. A party seeking sanctions against another party or person shall do so in a written motion stating the grounds for the motion and the relief sought. The motion shall be served upon all parties and upon any person against whom the sanctions are being sought. The court may initiate sanction proceedings upon its own motion by the entry of a show cause order. If the court imposes sanctions, it shall do so, after notice and a hearing, in a written order, making findings of fact and conclusions of law. An order imposing sanctions shall be reviewable upon appeal where the entire record as submitted shall be reviewed to determine whether the order is supported by substantial evidence.

Selection of mediator. — The parties to a superior court civil action in which a mediated settlement conference is to be held pursuant to this section shall have the right to designate a mediator. Upon failure of the parties to designate a mediator within the time established by the rules of the Supreme Court, a mediator shall be appointed by the senior resident superior court judge.

Promotion of other settlement procedures. — Nothing in this section is intended to preclude the use of other dispute resolution methods within the superior court. Parties to a superior court civil action are encouraged to select other available dispute resolution methods. The senior resident superior court judge, at the request of and with the consent of the parties, may order the parties to attend and participate in any other settlement procedure authorized by rules of the Supreme Court or by the local superior court rules, in lieu of attending a mediated settlement conference. Neutral third parties acting pursuant to this section shall be selected and compensated in accordance with such rules or pursuant to agreement of the parties. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the parties from participating in, or the court from ordering, other dispute resolution procedures, including arbitration to the extent authorized under State or federal law.

Immunity. — Mediator and other neutrals acting pursuant to this section shall have judicial immunity in the same manner and to the same extent as a judge of the General Court of Justice, except that mediators and other neutrals may be disciplined in accordance with enforcement procedures adopted by the Supreme Court pursuant to

G.S. 7A-38.2

.

Costs of mediated settlement conference. — Costs of mediated settlement conferences shall be borne by the parties. Unless otherwise ordered by the court or agreed to by the parties, the mediator’s fees shall be paid in equal shares by the parties. For purposes of this section, multiple parties shall be considered one party when they are represented by the same counsel. The rules adopted by the Supreme Court implementing this section shall set out a method whereby parties found by the court to be unable to pay the costs of the mediated settlement conference are afforded an opportunity to participate without cost. The rules adopted by the Supreme Court shall set the fees to be paid a mediator appointed by a judge upon the failure of the parties to designate a mediator.

Inadmissibility of negotiations. — Evidence of statements made and conduct occurring in a mediated settlement conference or other settlement proceeding conducted under this section, whether attributable to a party, the mediator, other neutral, or a neutral observer present at the settlement proceeding, shall not be subject to discovery and shall be inadmissible in any proceeding in the action or other civil actions on the same claim, except:

In proceedings for sanctions under this section;

In proceedings to enforce or rescind a settlement of the action;

In disciplinary hearings before the State Bar or the Dispute Resolution Commission; or

In proceedings to enforce laws concerning juvenile or elder abuse.As used in this section, the term “neutral observer” includes persons seeking mediator certification, persons studying dispute resolution processes, and persons acting as interpreters.No settlement agreement to resolve any or all issues reached at the proceeding conducted under this subsection or during its recesses shall be enforceable unless it has been reduced to writing and signed by the parties against whom enforcement is sought or signed by their designees. No evidence otherwise discoverable shall be inadmissible merely because it is presented or discussed in a mediated settlement conference or other settlement proceeding.No mediator, other neutral, or neutral observer present at a settlement proceeding shall be compelled to testify or produce evidence concerning statements made and conduct occurring in anticipation of, during, or as a follow-up to a mediated settlement conference or other settlement proceeding pursuant to this section in any civil proceeding for any purpose, including proceedings to enforce or rescind a settlement of the action, except to attest to the signing of any agreements, and except proceedings for sanctions under this section, disciplinary hearings before the State Bar or the Dispute Resolution Commission, and proceedings to enforce laws concerning juvenile or elder abuse.

Right to jury trial. — Nothing in this section or the rules adopted by the Supreme Court implementing this section shall restrict the right to jury trial.

History.

1995, c. 500, s. 1; 1999-354, s. 5; 2005-167, s. 1; 2008-194, s. 8(a); 2015-57, s. 1; 2017-158, s. 26.7(a); 2021-47, s. 12(a).

Cross References.

As to court ordered, mediated settlement conferences in superior court civil actions, see Rule 1, Rules for Mediated Settlement Conferences and Other Settlement Procedures in Superior Court Civil Actions, in the Annotated Rules of North Carolina.